cherokee/Cherokee.scptd/Contents/Resources/BrailleBlaster/programData/liblouis/tables/ink.ctb
largesign \x00CB 45-25-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
largesign \x00EB   45-25-15     [EB] lower e dieresis

largesign \x00CC 45-16-24     [CC] upper i grave
largesign \x00EC   45-16-24     [EC] lower i grave

largesign \x00CD 45-34-24     [CD] upper i acute
largesign \x00ED   45-34-24     [ED] lower i acute

largesign \x00CE 45-146-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
largesign \x00EE   45-146-24     [EE] lower i circumflex

largesign \x00CF 45-25-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
largesign \x00EF   45-25-24     [EF] lower i dieresis

#largesign \x00D0 4-15     [D0] upper eth
#largesign \x00F0   4-15     [F0] lower eth

largesign \x00D1 45-12456-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
largesign \x00F1   45-12456-1345   [F1] lower n tilde

largesign \x00D2 45-16-135    [D2] upper o grave
largesign \x00F2   45-16-135    [F2] lower o grave

largesign \x00D3 45-34-135    [D3] upper o acute
largesign \x00F3   45-34-135    [F3] lower o acute

largesign \x00D4 45-146-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
largesign \x00F4   45-146-135    [F4] lower o circumflex

largesign \x00D5 45-12456-135    [D5] upper o tilde
largesign \x00F5   45-12456-135    [F5] lower o tilde

largesign \x00D6 45-25-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
largesign \x00F6   45-25-135			[F6] lower o dieresis

#largesign \x00D8 4-135    [D8] upper o slash
#largesign \x00f8   4-135    [F8] lower o slash

largesign \x00D9 45-16-136    [D9] upper u grave
largesign \x00F9   45-16-136    [F9] lower u grave

largesign \x00DA 45-25-136    [DA] upper u acute
largesign \x00FA   45-25-136    [FA] lower u acute

largesign \x00DB 45-146-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
largesign \x00FB   45-146-136    [FB] lower u circumflex

largesign \x00DC 45-25-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
largesign \x00FC   45-25-136    [FC] lower u dieresis

largesign \x00DD 45-34-13456  [DD] upper y acute
largesign \x00FD   45-34-13456  [FD] lower y acute

#largesign \x00DE 4-2345   [DE] upper t horn
#largesign \x00FE   4-2345   [FE] lower t horn

largesign \x00DF 234-234 (DF) lower ss

largesign \x0174 45-146-2456 lower w circumflex
largesign \x0175 45-146-2456 upper w circumflex

largesign \x0176 45-146-13456 upper y circumflex
largesign \x0177 45-146-13456 lower y circumflex

largesign \x0178 45-26-13456 upper y dieresis
largesign \x00FF 45-25-13456 lower y dieresis

#largesign \x1EF2 4-16-13456 upper y with grave
#largesign \x1EF3 45-16-13456 lower y with grave

# always	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen
hyphen 	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen

# always	\x2011 46		 # 8209			non-breaking hyphen
punctuation \x2011 36		 # 8209			non-breaking hyphen

always	\x2013 5-36		 # 8211		smart minus sign


always	\x201C 45-236	 # 8220			smart opening double quote
always	\x201D 45-356	 # 8221			smart closing double quote
always	\x201E 236	 # 8222			smart double low quotation mark
always	\x201F 356	 # 8223			smart double high reverse quotation mark

# mathematical symbols
decpoint . 256
always < 4-126
always = 5-2356
midnum = 5-2356-3456
always > 4-345
always + 5-235
midnum + 5-235-3456
midnum - 36-3456
always - 36
#always × 5-236
#midnum × 5-236-3456
#midnum ÷ 5-34-3456 division sign
#always ÷ 5-34



# other special characters
always © 45-14 copyright
#sign ™ 45-2345 trademark
#sign ® 45-1235 registered
always ¶ 45-1234 paragraph
#always § 45-234 section
always ° 45-245 degrees
always £ 4-123 pounds
always $ 4-234
always ¢ 4-14 cents
#sign € 4-15	euro
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 46-134 mu
